Alaska statutes. Title 38. Public Land.
Article 10. Land Selection.

Sec. 38.05.290.
Selection practice.

The selection of grant, lieu and indemnity land shall conform to this chapter and the policy, orders and regulations adopted by the commissioner. The commissioner shall give preference of selection to the land which will provide the maximum benefits to the people of the state.

Consistent with the best interests of the state, in the selection of general grant land it is the policy of the state to make available the maximum land area from which municipalities may fulfill land entitlements under AS 29.65 or former AS 29.18.201 — 29.18.213.

History.

(§ 1 art XI ch 169 SLA 1959; am § 4 ch 180 SLA 1978; am § 58 ch 74 SLA 1985)

Collateral references. —

63C Am. Jur. 2d, Public Lands, §§ 14-39.